Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1844.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 34 O.S. 2021, Section 2, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 119, O.S.L. 2024 (34 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2. A. The form of initiative petition shall be
substantially as follows:
INITIATIVE PETITION
To the Honorable ______________, Governor of Oklahoma (or To the
Honorable ______________, Mayor, Chairman of County Commissioners,
or other chief executive officers, as the case may be, for the city,
county or other municipality): We, the undersigned legal voters of
the State of Oklahoma (and of the district of _______________,
county of _______________, or city of ________________, as the case
Req. No. 10739 Page 1

may be), respectfully order that the following proposed law (or
amendment to the constitution, ordinance, or amendment to the city
charter, as the case may be) shall be submitted to the legal voters
of the State of Oklahoma (or of the district of ______________,
county of ______________, or city of ______________, as the case may
be) for their approval or rejection at the regular general election
(or regular or special city election), to be held on the _____ day
of _________, 20__, and each for himself says: I have personally
signed this petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Oklahoma
(and of the district of _________, county of __________________,
city of ______________, as the case may be); the following five data
points shall be included on the form: the voter's legal first name,
legal last name that substantially conforms to the name in their
precinct registry, zip code, house number, and numerical month and
day of my birth. The time for filing this petition expires ninety
(90) days from (Secretary of State to insert assigned date when
petition is to begin signature circulation). (This for State
initiative. For county, city, or other municipality the length of
time shall be ninety (90) days.) The question we herewith submit to
our fellow voters is: Shall the following bill (or proposed
amendment to the Constitution or resolution) be approved? (Insert
here an exact copy of the text of the measure followed by proponents
of record (not to exceed three signatures, complete printed name and

Req. No. 10739 Page 2

addr ess associated with his or her Oklahoma voter registration
record).)
B. In order for the signature to be approved by the Secretary
of State, four or more data points described in subsection A of this
section must be matched to the voter registration file.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10739 MJ 01/15/25
















Req. No. 10739 Page 3